Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.003

Appointment of board members—Qualifications—Duties of chair—Salaries and travel expenses—Staffing.

(1) The board is created within the department. The board shall consist of a chair and four other members, each of whom shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate. Each member shall hold office for a term of five years, and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. The terms shall expire on April 15th of the expiration year. Vacancies in the membership of the board shall be filled by appointment by the governor with the consent of the senate. In the event of the inability of any member to act, the governor shall appoint some competent person to act in his or her stead during the continuance of such inability. The members shall not be removable during their respective terms except for cause determined by the superior court of Thurston county. The governor in appointing the members shall designate one of them to serve as chair at the governor's pleasure. The appointed chair shall serve as a fully participating board member.

(2) The department shall provide administrative and staff support for the board. The secretary may employ a senior administrative officer and such other personnel as may be necessary to assist the board in carrying out its duties.

(3) The members of the board and staff assigned to the board shall not engage in any other business or profession or hold any other public office without the prior approval of the executive ethics board indicating compliance with RCW 42.52.020, 42.52.030, 42.52.040, and 42.52.120; nor shall they, at the time of appointment or employment or during their incumbency, serve as the representative of any political party on an executive committee or other governing body thereof, or as an executive officer or employee of any political committee or association. The members of the board shall each severally receive salaries fixed by the governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040, and in addition shall receive travel expenses incurred in the discharge of their official duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 15; 2011 c 336 s 336; 2007 c 362 s 1; 1997 c 350 s 2; 1986 c 224 s 3; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 8; 1969 c 98 s 9; 1959 c 32 s 1; 1955 c 340 s 9. Prior: 1945 c 155 s 1, part; 1935 c 114 s 8, part; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 10249-8, part. Formerly RCW 43.67.020.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2011 c 336 s 336 and by 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 15, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Application—Recalculation of community custody terms—2011 1st sp.s. c 40: See note following RCW 9.94A.501.

Effective date—Severability—1986 c 224: See notes following RCW 9.95.001.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.

Severability—Effective date—1969 c 98: See notes following RCW 9.95.120.